California statutes. Education Code
The department, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 64001, shall monitor adherence to the requirements of Chapter 5.3 (commencing with Section 4900) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and this chapter as part of its regular monitoring and review of local educational agencies, commonly known as the Categorical Program Monitoring process. The department shall assess whether local educational agencies have done all of the following:

(a) Adopted a policy that prohibits discrimination, harassment, intimidation, and bullying based on the actual or perceived characteristics set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, and Section 220 of this code, and disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or
 ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or association with a person or group with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics. The policy shall include a statement that the policy applies to all acts related to school activity or school attendance occurring within a school under the jurisdiction of the local educational agency, and all acts of the governing board or body of the local educational agency, the superintendent of the school district, and the county superintendent of schools in enacting policies and procedures that govern the local educational agency.

(b) Adopted a process for receiving and investigating complaints of discrimination, harassment, intimidation, and bullying based on any of the actual or perceived characteristics set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, and Section 220 of this code, and disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or
 ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or association with a person or group with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics. The complaint process shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A requirement that, if school personnel witness an act of discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying, they shall take immediate steps to intervene when safe to do so.

(2) A timeline to investigate and resolve complaints of discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying that shall be followed by all schools under the jurisdiction of the school district.

(3) An appeal process afforded to the complainant in the case of a disagreement with the resolution of a complaint filed pursuant to this section.

(4) All forms
 developed pursuant to this process shall be translated pursuant to Section 48985.

(c) Publicized antidiscrimination, antiharassment, anti-intimidation, and antibullying policies adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), including information about the manner in which to file a complaint, to pupils, parents, employees, agents of the governing board, and the general public. The information shall be translated pursuant to Section 48985.

(d) (1) Provided, incident to the publicizing described in subdivision (c), to certificated schoolsite employees who serve pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, who are employed by the local educational agency, information on existing schoolsite and community resources related to the support of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and questioning (LGBTQ) pupils, or related to the support of pupils who may face bias or bullying
 on the basis of any of the actual or perceived characteristics set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, including immigration status, and Section 220 of this code, and disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, or association with a person or group with one or more of these actual or perceived characteristics.

(2) As used in this subdivision, both of the following apply:

(A) Schoolsite resources may include, but are not limited to, peer support or affinity clubs and organizations, safe spaces for LGBTQ or other at-promise pupils, counseling services, staff who have received antibias or other training aimed at supporting these pupils or who serve as designated support to these pupils, health and other curriculum materials that are inclusive of, and relevant to, these pupils, online training developed
 pursuant to Section 32283.5, and other policies adopted pursuant to this article, including related complaint procedures.

(B) Community resources may include, but are not limited to, community-based organizations that provide support to LGBTQ or other at-promise pupils and their families, and physical and mental health providers with experience or training in treating or supporting these pupils.

(e) Prominently and conspicuously displayed the policy established pursuant to subdivision (a) in areas that are accessible to, and commonly frequented by, schoolsite employees, pupils, and members of the public at each schoolsite and local educational agency office, including, but not limited to, in school office lobbies, staff lounges, pupil government meeting rooms, and on the local educational agency’s internet website.

(f) Maintained documentation of complaints and their resolution for a minimum of one review cycle.

(g) Ensured that complainants are protected from retaliation and that the identity of a complainant alleging discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying remains confidential, as appropriate.

(h) Identified a responsible local educational agency officer for ensuring school district or county office of education compliance with the requirements of Chapter 5.3 (commencing with Section 4900) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and this chapter.

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require school employees to engage with religious institutions in the course of identifying community support resources pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

234.2.

(a) The department shall display current information, and periodically update information, on curricula and other resources that specifically address bias-related discrimination, harassment, intimidation, cyber sexual bullying, as defined in Section 48900, and bullying based on any of the actual or perceived characteristics set forth in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code and Section 220 on the California Healthy Kids Resource Center Internet Web site and other appropriate department Internet Web sites where information about discrimination, harassment,
 intimidation, cyber sexual bullying, and bullying is posted.

(b) The department shall annually inform school districts of the information on the California Healthy Kids Resource Center Internet Web site and other appropriate department Internet Web sites where information about cyber sexual bullying is posted pursuant to subdivision (a). The department may use electronic mail to inform school districts of this information.

(c) School districts are encouraged to inform pupils regarding the available information and resources on the department’s Internet Web sites regarding the dangers and consequences of cyber sexual bullying to help reduce the instances of cyber sexual bullying.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (AB 2536)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

234.3.

The department shall develop a model handout describing the rights and obligations set forth in Sections 200, 201, and 220 and the policies addressing bias-related discrimination, harassment, intimidation, and bullying in schools. This model handout shall be posted on appropriate department Internet Web sites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 723, Sec. 4.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

234.4.

(a) A local educational agency shall adopt, on or before December 31, 2019, procedures for preventing acts of bullying, including cyberbullying.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “local educational agency” means a school district, a county office of education, or a charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.   (AB 2291)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

234.41.

(a) (1) On or before June 30, 2026, the department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall develop, post on its internet website, and distribute to each local educational agency, a model policy on how to address reported acts of cyberbullying occurring outside of school hours, provided that, when engaged in outside of the campus, the act is sufficiently severe or pervasive to have the actual and reasonably expected effect of creating an intimidating or hostile educational environment. The model policy shall clarify that local educational agencies are authorized, but not required, to address those acts. This section does not impose liability on a local educational agency for failing to address those acts.

(2) In developing the model policy required pursuant to paragraph (1), the department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, may use existing resources or frameworks, including, but not limited to, the Multi-Tiered System of Supports, which includes restorative justice practices, trauma-informed practices, social and emotional learning, and schoolwide positive behavior interventions and support, to be used to help pupils gain critical social and emotional skills, receive support to help transform trauma-related responses, understand the impact of their actions, and develop meaningful methods for repairing harm to the school community.

(3) In developing the model policy required pursuant to paragraph (1), the department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall
 consider establishing guidance on the factors necessary to determine what constitutes an intimidating or hostile educational environment, as well as the factors that demonstrate severity and pervasiveness.

(b) The model policy developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be appropriate for local educational agencies that serve pupils enrolled in any of grades 4 to 12, inclusive.

(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, each local educational agency shall adopt a policy, or modify its existing procedures adopted pursuant to Section 234.4, on how to address reported acts of cyberbullying occurring
 outside of school hours, provided that, when engaged in outside of the campus, the act is sufficiently severe or pervasive to have the actual and reasonably expected effect of creating an intimidating or hostile educational environment. The adopted policy may be the model policy developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) or a locally adopted policy with input from stakeholders.

(2) Each local educational agency shall post a copy of the adopted policy on its internet website and the internet website of each of its schoolsites.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (AB 772)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

234.5.

(a) (1) The Superintendent shall post, and annually update, on the department’s internet website and notify local educational agencies of the availability of a list of statewide resources, including community-based organizations, that provide support to youth, and their families, who have been subjected to school-based discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying, including school-based discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying on the basis of neurodiversity, religious affiliation, nationality, race, or ethnicity, or perceived neurodiversity, religious affiliation, nationality, race, or ethnicity.

(2) The resources included pursuant to paragraph (1) that provide support for youth, and their families, who have been subjected
 to school-based discrimination, harassment, intimidation, or bullying on the basis of neurodiversity shall include those developed by the University of California and California State University Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning.

(b) The department’s internet website shall also include a list of statewide resources for youth who have been affected by gangs, gun violence, and psychological trauma caused by violence at home, at school, and in the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 907, Sec. 1.   (SB 939)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.6. Bullying and Harassment Prevention Information [234.6. - 234.6.]

234.6.

(a) For purposes of this article, “local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school.

(b) Commencing with the 2020–21 academic year, each local educational agency shall ensure that all of the following information is readily accessible in a prominent location on the local educational agency’s existing internet website in a manner that is easily accessible to parents or guardians and pupils:

(1) The local educational agency’s policy on pupil suicide prevention in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, adopted pursuant to Section 215.

(2) The local educational agency’s policy on pupil
 suicide prevention in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, adopted pursuant to Section 215, including reference to the age appropriateness of that policy.

(3) The definition of discrimination and harassment based on sex as described in Section 230. This shall include the rights set forth in Section 221.8.

(4) The Title IX information included on a local educational agency’s internet website pursuant to Section 221.61.

(5) A link to the Title IX information included on the department’s internet website pursuant to Section 221.6.

(6) The local educational agency’s written policy on sexual harassment, as it pertains to pupils, prepared pursuant to Section 231.5.

(7) The local
 educational agency’s policy, if it exists, on preventing and responding to hate violence as described in Section 233.

(8) The local educational agency’s anti-discrimination, anti-harassment, anti-intimidation, and anti-bullying policies as described in Section 234.1.

(9) The local educational agency’s anti-cyberbullying procedures adopted pursuant to Section 234.4.

(10) A section on social media bullying that includes all of the following references to possible forums for social media bullying:

(A) Internet websites with free registration and ease of registration.

(B) Internet websites offering peer-to-peer instant messaging.

(C) Internet websites offering comment forums or sections.

(D) Internet websites offering image or video posting platforms.

(11) A link to statewide resources, including community-based organizations, compiled by the department pursuant to Section 234.5.

(12) Any additional information a local educational agency deems important for preventing bullying and harassment.

(c) Commencing with the 2025–26 academic year, each local educational agency shall ensure that the resources related to neurodiversity developed by the University of California and California State University Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning are readily accessible in a prominent location on the local educational agency’s internet website in a manner that is easily
 accessible to parents or guardians and pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 907, Sec. 2.   (SB 939)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.7. Pupil Protections Relating to Immigration and Citizenship Status [234.7. - 234.7.]

234.7.

(a) Except as required by state or federal law or as required to administer a state or federally supported educational program, school officials and employees of a local educational agency shall not do either of the following:

(1) Collect information or documents regarding citizenship or immigration status of pupils or their family members.

(2) Allow an officer or employee of an agency conducting immigration enforcement to enter a nonpublic area of a schoolsite for any purpose without being presented with a valid judicial warrant or judicial subpoena, or a court order. Any school official or employee of a local educational agency shall, to the extent practicable, request a valid identification from an
 officer or employee of an agency conducting immigration enforcement seeking to enter a nonpublic area of a schoolsite. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit a local educational agency’s or school official’s right to consult with counsel or challenge the validity of a warrant, subpoena, or court order in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) A local educational agency and its personnel, to the extent practicable, shall not disclose or provide in writing, verbally, or in any other manner, the education records of or any information about a pupil or a pupil’s family and household without the pupil’s parents’ or guardians’ written consent, a school employee, or a teacher, including, but not limited to, personal information as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code, information about a pupil’s home, and information about a pupil’s travel schedule, to an officer or employee of an agency conducting immigration
 enforcement absent a valid judicial warrant or judicial subpoena, or court order directing the local educational agency or its personnel to do so. Any disclosure of a pupil’s education records pursuant to a valid judicial warrant or judicial subpoena, or court order shall be in accordance with the parent notification requirements set forth in Section 99.31(a)(9)(ii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) The superintendent of a school district, the superintendent of a county office of education, and the principal of a charter school, as applicable, shall report to the respective governing board or body of the local educational agency in a timely manner any requests for information or access to a schoolsite by an officer or employee of a law enforcement agency for the purpose of enforcing the immigration laws in a manner that ensures the confidentiality and privacy of any potentially identifying information.

(d) If an employee of a school is aware that a pupil’s parent or guardian is not available to care for the pupil, the school shall first exhaust any parental instruction relating to the pupil’s care in the emergency contact information it has for the pupil to arrange for the pupil’s care. A school is encouraged to work with parents or guardians to update their emergency contact information and not to contact a child protective services agency to arrange for the pupil’s care unless the school is unable to arrange for care through the use of emergency contact information or other information or instructions provided by the parent or guardian.

(e) The governing board or body of a local educational agency shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Provide information to parents and guardians, as
 appropriate, regarding their child’s right to a free public education, regardless of immigration status or religious beliefs. This information shall include information relating to both of the following:

(i) The Immigration-Enforcement Actions at California Schools Guide for Students and Families, also known as “Know Your Educational Rights,” developed by the Attorney General.

(ii) “Promoting a Safe and Secure Learning Environment for All: Guidance and Model Policies to Assist California’s K–12 Schools in Responding to Immigration Issues” issued by the Attorney General on January 6, 2025, including, but not limited to, information related to plans for family safety, the caregiver’s authorization affidavit in Section 6552 of the Family Code, and the importance of providing the school with, and regularly updating, emergency contact information, including secondary and additional
 contact information. The provided information shall be revised as necessary to be consistent with any revisions or updates to the guidance issued by the Attorney General.

(B) The information may be provided in the annual notification to parents and guardians pursuant to Section 48980 or any other cost-effective means determined by the local educational agency.

(C) The guide specified in clause (i) subparagraph (A) shall be posted in the administrative buildings and on the internet websites of the local educational agency and each of its schoolsites. The guide shall be posted in every language that the Attorney General provides and shall be updated the school year following any updates published by the Attorney General.

(2) Educate pupils about the negative impact of bullying other pupils based on their actual or
 perceived immigration status or their religious beliefs and customs.

(f) This section does not prohibit the governing board or body of a local educational agency from establishing stronger standards and protections.

(g) (1) The Attorney General, by April 1, 2018, in consultation with the appropriate stakeholders, shall publish model policies limiting assistance with immigration enforcement at public schools, to the fullest extent possible consistent with federal and state law, and ensuring that public schools remain safe and accessible to all California residents, regardless of immigration status. The Attorney General shall, at a minimum, consider all of the following issues when developing the model policies:

(A) Procedures related to requests for access to school grounds for purposes related
 to immigration enforcement.

(B) Procedures for local educational agency employees to notify the superintendent of the school district or the superintendent’s designee, the superintendent of the county office of education or the superintendent’s designee, or the principal of the charter school or the principal’s designee, as applicable, if an individual requests or gains access to school grounds for purposes related to immigration enforcement.

(C) Procedures for responding to requests for personal information about pupils or their family members for purposes of immigration enforcement.

(2) The Attorney General shall, no later than December 1, 2025, update the model policies described in paragraph (1) to ensure that these policies align with the prohibition applicable to school officials and employees of local
 educational agencies as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and the requirements for local educational agencies, as described in this section.

(3) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the Department of Justice may implement, interpret, or make specific this section without taking any regulatory action.

(h) All local educational agencies shall do all of the following:

(1) Adopt the model policies developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), or equivalent policies, by July 1, 2018.

(2) Revise their model policies as necessary to be consistent with any revisions or updates to the model
 policies developed by the Attorney General, including “Promoting a Safe and Secure Learning Environment for All: Guidance and Model Policies to Assist California’s K–12 Schools in Responding to Immigration Issues” issued by the Attorney General on January 6, 2025, including, but not limited to, information related to plans for family safety, the caregiver’s authorization affidavit in Section 6552 of the Family Code, and the importance of providing the school with, and regularly updating, emergency contact information, including secondary and additional contact information.

(3) Update their model policies to align with this section, including paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), by March 1, 2026.

(i) This section does not prohibit or restrict any governmental entity or official from sending to, or receiving from, federal immigration authorities, information regarding the citizenship
 or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of an individual, or from requesting from federal immigration authorities immigration status information, lawful or unlawful, of any individual, or maintaining or exchanging that information with any other federal, state, or local governmental entity, pursuant to Sections 1373 and 1644 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(j) A local educational agency shall maintain its policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (h) and make the policy available to the department upon request.

(k) Local educational agencies may be subject to monitoring and auditing by the department to ensure compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (h) and (j).

(l) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) “Schoolsite” means an individual school campus of a school district, county office of education, or charter school, an area where a local educational agency’s school-sponsored activity is currently being held, or a schoolbus or other transportation provided by a local educational agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 664, Sec. 3.3.   (AB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Alternative Schools, Charter Schools, and School Choice [235. - 235.]

235.

There shall be no discrimination on the basis of the characteristics listed in Section 220 in any aspect of the operation of alternative schools or charter schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Instructional Materials [240. - 244.]

240.

Governing boards of school districts shall adopt instructional materials in accordance with the provisions of Section 60040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1117, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

241.

Nothing in the California Student Safety and Violence Prevention Act of 2000 requires the inclusion of any curriculum, textbook, presentation, or other material in any program or activity conducted by an educational institution or postsecondary educational institution; the California Student Safety and Violence Prevention Act of 2000 shall not be deemed to be violated by the omission of any curriculum, textbook, presentation, or other material in any program or activity conducted by an educational institution or postsecondary educational
 institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 587, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

242.

No later than July 1, 2025, the department shall develop guidance and public educational materials, including an internet website and other communications materials, to ensure that all Californians can access information about educational laws and policies that safeguard the right to an accurate and inclusive curriculum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 229, Sec. 3.   (AB 1078)   Effective September 25, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

243.

(a) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school shall not refuse to approve the use or prohibit the use of any textbook, instructional material, supplemental instructional material, or other curriculum for classroom instruction or any book or other resource in a school library on the basis that it includes a study of the role and contributions of any individual or group consistent with the requirements of Sections 51204.5 and 60040, unless the study of the role and contributions violates Section 51501 or 60044.

(b) Any action taken by the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school that violates subdivision (a)
 constitutes unlawful discrimination pursuant to Section 220.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a complaint pursuant to this section may be filed with the applicable school district, county office of education, or charter school under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, or may be filed with the Superintendent directly. In responding to such a complaint, the Superintendent may directly intervene without waiting for an investigation by the school district, county office of education, or charter school. A complaint filed pursuant to this subdivision shall identify the basis for filing the complaint directly with the Superintendent. The complainant shall present the Superintendent with evidence that supports the basis for the direct filing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 229, Sec. 4.   (AB 1078)   Effective September 25, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

244.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school shall not adopt or approve the use of any textbook, instructional material, supplemental instructional material, professional development materials, or curriculum for classroom instruction if the use of the textbook, instructional material, supplemental instructional material, or curriculum would subject a pupil to unlawful discrimination pursuant to Section 220.

(2) If the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body
 of a charter school knows or has reason to know that materials were used in a classroom or an action occurred that violated Section 220, the governing board of the school district, the county board of education, or the governing body of the charter school shall investigate and remediate the action, which may include, but is not limited to, the implementation of restorative justice practices.

(b) (1) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school shall not adopt or approve the use of any professional development materials or services if the professional development materials or services promote, endorse, or otherwise support actions or the use of any textbook, instructional material, supplemental instructional material, or curriculum which would subject a
 pupil to unlawful discrimination pursuant to Section 220.

(2) If the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school knows or has reason to know that professional development materials or services were used or an action occurred that violated Section 220, the governing board of the school district, the county board of education, or the governing body of the charter school shall investigate and remediate the action, which may include, but is not limited to, the implementation of restorative justice practices. 

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a complaint pursuant to this section may be filed with the applicable school district, county office of education, or charter school under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set
 forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, or may be filed with the Superintendent directly. A complaint filed pursuant to this subdivision shall identify the basis for filing the complaint directly with the Superintendent. The complainant shall present the Superintendent with evidence that supports the basis for the direct filing and why immediate action is necessary. In responding to such a complaint, the Superintendent may directly intervene without waiting for an investigation by the school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(d) A complaint may be filed by any member of the public, including anyone electing to file anonymously, if the complaint provides evidence or information leading to evidence to support an allegation of noncompliance with
 subdivision (a).

(e) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to pupils, parents and guardians, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or any successor regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Compliance [250. - 253.]

250.

Prior to receipt of any state financial assistance or state student financial aid, an educational institution shall provide assurance to the agency administering the funds, in the manner required by the funding agency, that each program or activity conducted by the educational institution will be conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and all other applicable provisions of state law prohibiting discrimination. A single assurance, not more than one page in length and signed by an appropriate responsible official of the educational institution,
 may be provided for all the programs and activities conducted by an educational institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

251.

(a) A school district shall submit timely, complete, and accurate compliance reports to the State Department of Education as that entity may require.

(b) All reports submitted pursuant to this section shall be made available by the educational institution for public inspection during regular business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, to the extent possible within existing resources, review and revise, where necessary, the policies and practices of programs administered by the department that provide services to school districts in order to promote improved gender equity.

(b) The superintendent shall make available, upon request, wherever possible, the following data, compiled by gender and ethnicity:

(1) Assessment scores for all grades tested.

(2) The number of pupils enrolled in mathematics and science courses, as well as courses in other fields of study in which ethnic minority populations or members of either gender have been traditionally underrepresented among participants.

(3) The number of high school graduates.

(4) The number of high school graduates who complete the minimum requirements for admission to the University of California.

(5) The number of pupils who leave school before graduation.

(6) The number of pupils participating in interscholastic athletics.

(c) The superintendent shall request
 the United States Department of Education to amend the Title IV-C grant for race, sex, and national origin desegregation received pursuant to Section 2000c-2 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, so that funds received under those federal laws that are currently designated for technical assistance activities also may be used for gender equity monitoring and assistance activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1123, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

(a) Compliance with the sex discrimination provisions of this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be included in the annual Coordinated Compliance Review Manual provided to school districts by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Any review of that compliance shall also include a review of the school district’s records of complaints of sexual harassment brought by pupils and employees of the school district.

(b) The superintendent shall annually
 review 20 school districts for compliance with sex discrimination laws and regulations as specified in subdivision (a). The superintendent shall select from those districts subject to review, in a given year, a sampling of districts from each of the following categories:

(1) Those districts within which the greatest number of sex discrimination complaints have been filed since its previous coordinated compliance review.

(2) Those districts with the largest enrollments.

(3) All other districts, selected on a random basis.

(c) The superintendent and the department shall only be required to implement the provisions enumerated in this section in fiscal years in which sufficient funds have been appropriated for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Enforcement [260. - 262.4.]

260.

The governing board of a school district shall have the primary responsibility for ensuring that school district programs and activities are free from discrimination based on age and the characteristics listed in Section 220 and for monitoring compliance with any and all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 11138 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

262.3.

(a) (1) A party to a written complaint of prohibited discrimination may appeal the action taken by the governing board of a school district pursuant to this article, to the department.

(2) In accordance with Section 4650(a)(4) of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, pursuant to this article, a party to a written complaint of prohibited discrimination may appeal based on a governing board of a local educational agency’s failure to issue an investigation report within the timeline required under Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, pursuant to this article, directly with the Superintendent. The complaint shall present the Superintendent with evidence that supports the basis for the direct filing and why immediate action is necessary. Prior to direct intervention by the Superintendent, the department shall attempt to work with the local educational agency to issue a local educational agency investigation report within the timeline required under Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations,
 pursuant to this article, with the Superintendent.

(b) Persons who have filed a complaint, pursuant to this chapter, with an educational institution shall be advised by the educational institution that civil law remedies, including, but not limited to, injunctions, restraining orders, or other remedies or orders may also be available to complainants. The educational institution shall make this information available by publication in appropriate informational materials.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an exhaustion of the administrative complaint process before civil law remedies may be pursued.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who alleges
 a violation of Section 220, 243, 244, 51500, 51501, or 60044 may seek civil remedies pursuant to this section after 60 days have elapsed from the filing of an appeal to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the